Utah statutes.
48-2c-710.   Expulsion of a member.
A member of a company may be expelled:
(1)  as provided in the company's operating agreement;
(2)  by unanimous vote of the other members if it is unlawful to carry on the
company's business with the member; or
(3)  on application by the company or another member, by judicial
determination that the member:
(a)  has engaged in wrongful conduct that adversely and materially affected
the company's business;
(b)  has willfully or persistently committed a material breach of the articles
of organization or operating agreement or of a duty owed to the company or to
the other members under Section 48-2c-807; or
(c)  has engaged in conduct relating to the company's business which makes it
not reasonably practicable to carry on the business with the member.
